Utah statutes.
75-5-422.   Sale, encumbrance or transaction involving conflict of interest -- Voidable -- Exceptions.

Any sale or encumbrance to a conservator, his spouse, agent, or attorney, or any corporation or trust in which he has a substantial beneficial interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial conflict of interest, is voidable unless the transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested persons and others as directed by the court.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

